th: วิธีการติดตั้งเสา: ฝังดินโดยตรง; ติดตั้งติดกับรั้ว; แท่งกราวด์; ติดตั้งบนพื้นผิว; ติดผนัง; อื่นๆ
es: Método de instalación de postes: Entierro directo; Montaje de valla; Punta para anclaje en el suelo; Montaje en superficie; Montaje en pared; Otros
ja: ポスト設置方法: 直接埋設; フェンスマウント; 埋め込み用支柱固定金具; 表面実装; ウォールマウント; その他
pl: Metoda montażu tyczki: Do bezpośredniego montażu w gruncie; Montaż do ogrodzenia; Szpilka gruntowa; Montaż powierzchniowy; Montaż ścienny; Inne
zh-CN: 安装后方法: 直埋型; 围栏安装; 地桩式; 表面安装; 墙面安装; 其他
fr: Méthode d’installation du poteau: Enfouissement direct; Support de clôture; Piquet de sol; Installation en surface; Support mural; Autre
lt-LT: Žemo stulpo montavimo būdas: Tiesioginis įkasimas; Tvoros laikiklis; Žemės smaigalys; Montuojamas paviršiuje; Sieninis; Kita
it: Metodo di montaggio del palo: Interramento diretto; Supporto per recinzione; Picchetto da terra; Montaggio superficiale; Montaggio a parete; Altro
vi: Phương pháp lắp đặt cột: Chôn trực tiếp; Gắn trên hàng rào; Cọc tiếp đất; Gắn bề mặt; Treo tường; Khác
hu: Oszlop telepítési módja: Közvetlenül földbe fektethető; Kerítéstartó; Leszúrótüske; Felületi rögzítés; Falra szerelhető; Egyéb
nl: Installatiemethode voor palen: Direct ingravingsgeschikt; Hekmontage; Grondanker; Opbouwmontage; Muurbevestiging; Overig
en: Post installation method: Direct burial; Fence mount; Ground spike; Surface mount; Wall mount; Other
zh-TW: 立柱安裝方式: 直埋式; 柵欄固定; 固定針; 表面貼裝; 壁掛式; 其他
sl-SI: Način namestitve stebra: Za neposredno pokopavanje; Nosilec za ograjo; Talni klin; Površinska montaža; Montaža na steno; Druga
sv: Metod för eftermontering: Direktnedgrävning; Staketmontering; Markspett; Ytmontering; Väggmontering; Övrigt
sk-SK: Spôsob inštalácie schránky: Priame zakopanie; Montáž na plot; Kolík do zeme; Povrchová montáž; Nástenný držiak; Iné
fi: Tolpan asennustapa: Maahanhaudattava; Aitaan kiinnitys; Maapiikki; Pinta-asennus; Seinään kiinnitettävä; Muu
pt-PT: Método de instalação do poste: Enterramento direto; Suporte para cerca; Estaca de enterrar; Montagem na superfície; Montagem na parede; Outro
ru: Способ установки столба: Прямое вкапывание; Крепление забора; Грунтовый анкер; Монтаж на поверхности; Настенное крепление; Другое
ro-RO: Metodă de instalare a stâlpului: Îngropare directă; Montare pe gard; Țăruș de sol; Montare pe suprafață; Montare pe perete; Altele
ko: 기둥 설치 방식: 직접 매설; 펜스 마운트; 그라운드 스파이크; 표면 장착; 벽설치용; 기타
nb: Etterinstallasjonsmetode: Direkte nedgraving; Gjerdemontering; Jordspyd; Overflatemontering; Veggfeste; Annet
el: Μέθοδος εγκατάστασης στύλου: Άμεση έμπηξη στο έδαφος; Βάση φράχτη; Με αιχμή εδάφους; Επιφανειακή στήριξη; Επιτοίχια στήριξη; Άλλο
hr-HR: Način postavljanja nosača: Za direktno ukopavanje; Montaža na ogradu; Šiljak za tlo; Montaža na površinu; Zidna montaža; Ostalo
pt-BR: Método de instalação do poste: Enterramento direto; Fixação em cerca; Estaca de solo; Suporte de superfície; Suporte para paredes; Outro
de: Pfosteninstallationsmethode: Erdverlegung; Zaunhalterung; Bodenspieß; Oberflächenmontage; Wandhalterung; Sonstiges
da: Stolpeinstallationsmetode: Direkte nedgravning; Hegnmontering; Jordspyd; Overflademontering; Vægbeslag; Andet
tr: Direk montaj yöntemi: Doğrudan gömme; Çit montajlı; Zemin çivisi; Yüzeye montaj; Duvara monte; Diğer
bg-BG: Метод след инсталиране: За директно заравяне; За монтаж на ограда; С кол за земя; Повърхностен монтаж; За монтаж на стена; Друго
cs: Způsob instalace sloupku: Přímé zakopání; Uchycení na plot; Kotvicí hrot; Na povrch; Na stěnu; Jiné